Illinois, session 104th, SB1044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The County Economic Development Project Area 5Property Tax Allocation Act is amended by changing Section 1 6as follows: 7    (55 ILCS 85/1)  (from Ch. 34, par. 7001)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 9cited as the County Economic Development Project Area Property 10Tax Allocation Act.11(Source: P.A. 86-1388.)